Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4109.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.217, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Evidence required for filing. Before a delayed record of birth is registered, the person presenting the delayed vital record for registration shall offer evidence of the facts contained in the vital record, as required by the rules of the commissioner. In the absence of the evidence required, the delayed vital record shall not be registered. deleted text begin Nodeleted text end new text begin Anew text end delayed record of birth deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin maynew text end be registered for a deceased personnew text begin up to seven years from the date of birth when the required evidence is providednew text end .new text begin Upon registering a delayed birth record for a deceased person, the record shall be marked "deceased."new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.222, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Fetal death report required. A fetal death must be registered or reported within five days of the death of a fetus for whom 20 or more weeks of gestation have elapsed, except for abortions defined under section 145.411, subdivision 5. A fetal death must be registered or reported in a format prescribed by the state registrar and filed in accordance with Minnesota Rules, parts 4601.0100 to 4601.2600 by: (1) a person in charge of an institution or that person's authorized designee if a fetus is delivered in the institution or en route to the institution; (2) a physician, certified nurse midwife, or other licensed medical personnel in attendance at or immediately after the delivery if a fetus is delivered outside an institution; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (3) a parent or other person in charge of the disposition of the remains if a fetal death occurred without medical attendance at or immediately after the deliverydeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (4) a medical examiner or coroner who receives a report of a fetal death under Minnesota Statutes, section 390.11, subdivision 1, clause (9), and verifies the vital event occurred. new text end